Hawaii statutes.
[§672B-10] Expungement of records;
liability insurance rates. (a) Upon a decision by the design claim
conciliation panel finding for the design professional pursuant to section 672B‑9(a),
the design professional may apply to the panel for expungement of all records
of the related proceedings. The panel shall expunge all records if a majority
of the panel finds that the complaint is fraudulent or frivolous.

(b) No insurer providing professional
liability insurance for a design professional shall increase any premium rate
for the design professional on the basis of the filing of a tort claim against
the design professional that is determined by the design claim conciliation
panel to be fraudulent or frivolous. [L 2007, c 207, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next